Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 5. Regional Jails and Jail Farms.

§ 53.1-105.
County and city regional jail or jail farm; persons who may be confined; release and transfer of prisoners.

Any combination of two or more counties or cities may establish, maintain and operate a regional jail or jail farm. Any person convicted and sentenced to confinement in the jail or jail farm of such county or city or sentenced to a state correctional facility may be confined in a regional jail farm and required to do work as may be assigned him during the term of his sentence. Any regional jail may be used to hold or confine any person who could lawfully be held or confined in a jail operated and maintained separately.

Subject to the provisions of §

53.1-113

and in the absence of private transportation arranged by the prisoner, any prisoner, after having completed a term of incarceration and upon release from a regional jail operated within Planning District Four or Planning District Five, shall be transported by such regional jail to the locality where the prisoner was arrested or convicted.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-206.1; 1956, c. 681; 1970, c. 648; 1974, c. 553; 1979, c. 700; 1982, c. 636; 1999, c. 990; 2010, c. 547.

The 1999 amendment

added the last paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 547 inserted “or Planning District Five” in the last paragraph.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Regional jail board membership. —

The board membership for a regional jail specified in §

53.1-106

controls over an agreement between several localities that specifies the membership of the board.
The county can continue to appoint two members to serve on the Board, since the minimum requirements of subsection A of §

53.1-106

have been met. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable W.R. “Randy” Hamilton, Sheriff, City of Buena Vista, 10-100, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 61 (10/22/10).

§ 53.1-106.
Members of jail or jail farm board or regional jail authority; powers; payment of pro rata costs.

Each regional jail or jail farm shall be supervised and managed by a board or authority to consist of at least the sheriff from each participating political subdivision, and one representative from each political subdivision participating therein who shall be appointed by the local governing body thereof. Any member of the local governing body of each participating political subdivision shall be eligible for appointment to the jail or jail farm board or regional jail authority. However, no one shall serve as a member of the board or authority who serves as an administrator or superintendent of a correctional facility supervised and managed by the board.Alternate members may be appointed to the board. Such alternate members shall be selected in the same manner as regular members, except that a sheriff may appoint his own alternate. The term of each alternate shall be determined by the sheriff or the political subdivision, whichever appointed the alternate. If a regular member is not present at a meeting of the board, the alternate for that member shall have all the voting and other rights of a regular member and shall be counted for purposes of determining a quorum at any meeting.

The board shall have the power to:

Establish rules and regulations governing the operation of the jail or jail farm not inconsistent with standards of the State Board of Local and Regional Jails;

Purchase land for the jail or jail farm for joint ownership by the participating political subdivisions with the approval of the local governing bodies;

Provide for all necessary stock, equipment and structures for the jail or jail farm within the budget approved therefor by the participating political subdivisions; and

Appoint a superintendent of such jail or jail farm and necessary jail officers therefor who shall serve at the pleasure of the board.The political subdivisions establishing a regional jail or jail farm shall pay their pro rata costs for land, stock, equipment and structures.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-206.1, 53-206.3, 53-206.4, 53-206.5; 1974, c. 553; 1979, c. 700; 1982, c. 636; 1990, c. 185; 1991, cc. 529, 566, 567, 568; 1992, cc. 212, 628; 1994, cc. 102, 270, 354; 1997, c. 340; 1998, c. 541; 2020, c. 759.

Cross references.

As to prohibition on dual office holding, see §

15.2-1535

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1991, c. 568, cl. 2 provides that the membership of regional jail farm boards provided for by this section, regional jail authorities, and jail authorities provided for by Article 3.1 (§

53.1-95.2

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 53.1 established prior to March 25, 1991, and all actions taken by such boards and authorities prior to March 25, 1991, are hereby ratified and confirmed. For prior similar provisions see Acts 1991, c. 529, cl. 2.

The 1997 amendment,

in subsection A, inserted “except as provided herein” at the end of the first sentence of the first paragraph, and in the first sentence of the second paragraph, deleted “the board shall, by majority vote, appoint” preceding “a sheriff of one” and inserted “shall be appointed by majority vote of the sheriffs of the participating subdivisions” following “a sheriff of one of the participating subdivisions.”

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection A, in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, inserted “or authority” and inserted “the sheriff from each participating political subdivision, and,” and deleted “except as provided herein” following “body thereof,” in the second sentence, deleted “The sheriff and” preceding “Any member,” and in the third sentence, substituted “no one shall serve as a member of the board or authority who serves as an” for “when a participating political subdivision appoints more than one representative to a regional jail or jail farm board, the sheriff shall be appointed unless the sheriff is the”; deleted the former second paragraph relating to appointments of sheriffs to regional jail or jail farm boards; and in the present second paragraph, deleted “Political subdivisions may appoint” preceding “Alternate,” deleted “of” following “members,” and inserted “may be appointed to.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759 substituted “Local and Regional Jails” for “Corrections” in subdivision B 1.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Qualified law-enforcement officer under federal Act. —

A local or regional jail officer who is not part of a local police or sheriff’s department may meet the definition of a “qualified law enforcement officer” for purposes of the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Charles E. Jett, Sheriff for Stafford County, 05-026 (6/21/05).

Concealed weapons. —

A regional jail authority may generally prohibit its officers, or prohibit a particular officer, from carrying a concealed weapon absent a valid concealed handgun permit. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Charles E. Jett, Sheriff for Stafford County, 05-026 (6/21/05).

Execution of criminal warrants. —

Officers of a regional jail do not have the authority to execute criminal warrants in the jail. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Roy F. Evans, Jr., Commonwealth’s Attorney for Smyth County, 06-005 (3/22/06).

Regional jail board membership. —

The board membership for a regional jail specified in §

53.1-106

controls over an agreement between several localities that specifies the membership of the board.
The county can continue to appoint two members to serve on the Board, since the minimum requirements of subsection A of §

53.1-106

have been met. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable W.R. “Randy” Hamilton, Sheriff, City of Buena Vista, 10-100, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 61 (10/22/10).

§ 53.1-106.1.
Location of jail facilities.

No regional jail or jail farm board or authority created by any combination of two or more counties or cities, whether pursuant to this article or Article 3.1 (§

53.1-95.2

et seq.) of this chapter, or an Act of Assembly, shall locate a jail or jail farm in a political subdivision which is not a participating political subdivision in the board or authority unless the governing body of the nonparticipating political subdivision grants express consent to such location.

History.

1991, c. 593.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1994, c. 260, cl. 1 provides that the second enactment of Chapter 593 of the Acts of Assembly of 1991, as amended by Chapter 206 of the Acts of Assembly of 1992, is repealed. Therefore, this section will no longer expire on July 1, 1994.

§ 53.1-107.
Organization of board; annual report.

The regional jail or jail farm board shall elect a chairman and secretary.

The board shall submit annually to the participating political subdivisions a report showing its activities; a budget, which shall include all revenues, expenditures and employee compensation schedules; and other similar data.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-206.4; 1956, c. 681; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-108.
Expenses and allowance.

Members of the regional jail or jail farm board shall be entitled to necessary expenses incurred in attending meetings of the board. They shall each receive an allowance for each day they are in attendance on the board. Such expenses and allowances shall not exceed in any one year the sum of $1,200 per member and shall be paid by the respective governing bodies.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-206.3; 1956, c. 681; 1970, c. 648; 1982, c. 636; 1986, c. 191.

§ 53.1-109.
Authority of jail superintendent and jail officers; fees charged to prisoner.

The jail superintendent shall have and exercise the same control and authority over the prisoners committed or transferred to a regional jail or jail farm as the sheriffs of this Commonwealth have by law over the prisoners committed or transferred to local jails.

During the term of their appointment the superintendent and jail officers are hereby invested with the powers and authority of a conservator of the peace (i) within the limits of such jail or jail farm and within one mile thereof, whether such jail or jail farm is situated within or beyond the limits of such political subdivisions establishing and maintaining the same; (ii) for the purpose of conveying prisoners to and from such jail or jail farm; (iii) for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of alternative incarceration or treatment programs pursuant to §§

53.1-129

,

53.1-131

, and

53.1-131.2

; (iv) for the purpose of providing security and supervision of prisoners taken to a medical, dental, or psychiatric facility; and (v) for the purpose of providing a security escort and supervision of prisoners transported to a funeral or graveside service. Prisoners may be charged reasonable fees for services described in clause (v).

History.

Code 1950, § 53-206.6; 1956, c. 681; 1970, c. 648; 1982, c. 636; 1991, c. 383; 1994, cc. 923, 953; 1999, cc. 829, 846; 2002, c. 336; 2004, c. 378.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 829 and 846 are identical, and substituted “Article 1 (§

19.2-119

et seq.) of Chapter 9 of Title 19.2” for “§

19.2-123

” in clause (iii) of the second paragraph.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 336 added the last sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 378 deleted “and pretrial supervision programs operated pursuant to Article 1 (§

19.2-119

et seq.) of Chapter 9 of Title 19.2” following “53.1-131.2” in clause (iii) in the last paragraph.

§ 53.1-109.01.
Authority for regional jail officers to carry weapons.

It shall be lawful for any regional jail officer who has been designated by the superintendent, and who has completed the basic course in firearms for jailers and custodial officers pursuant to subdivision 7 of §

9.1-102

, to carry and use sufficient weapons to prevent escapes, suppress rebellion, and defend or protect himself or others in the course of his assigned duties.

History.

1999, c. 131.

§ 53.1-109.1.
Handling of funds for regional jail or jail farm; county or city treasurer or director of finance as fiscal agent.

Any regional jail or jail farm constituted pursuant to the provisions of this article may appoint as its fiscal agent the treasurer of a county or city which is a member of the board of the jail or jail farm, or in a member jurisdiction where there is no treasurer, the director of finance. No treasurer or director of finance shall be appointed fiscal agent without their concurrence. In the event such treasurer or director of finance is appointed, all disbursements on behalf of the jail or jail farm shall be by warrant signed by the chairman of the board of the jail or jail farm or his designee and countersigned by such treasurer or director of finance as fiscal agent. For his services as fiscal agent, a treasurer or director of finance thus appointed may be paid such salary supplement and reimbursed such expenses as may be agreed upon by the board of the jail or jail farm and the treasurer or director of finance. Such salary supplement and expenses shall be borne exclusively by the regional jail or jail farm and not by the Compensation Board.

History.

1996, c. 623.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Demurrer granted. —

In a case in which the county published a request for proposals for healthcare services for the inmates of the jail pursuant to the Virginia Public Procurement Act, the court granted the county’s and the jail authority’s second demurrer as the county could not be held liable as the jail authority’s fiscal agent because plaintiff’s amended complaint did not allege that the county was acting outside the scope of its agency and/or for its own benefit. Mediko, P.C. v. Roanoke Cty., 100 Va. Cir. 323, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 623 (Roanoke County Nov. 9, 2018).

§ 53.1-109.2.
Regional jail superintendents not to be interested in private corrections enterprises.

No regional jail superintendent shall also serve as an officer or partner of, or derive any personal benefit from, any private corrections enterprise or private corrections corporation doing business in the Commonwealth. However, nothing in this section shall prohibit any regional jail superintendent from providing consultation services for remuneration to any public entity regarding correctional matters, or from receiving pension, deferred compensation or other retirement benefits arising exclusively out of employment by a private corrections enterprise or private corrections corporation prior to appointment as superintendent.

History.

1996, c. 623.

§ 53.1-110.
Oath and bond of superintendent and jail officers.

Before entering upon the duties of their office the superintendent and jail officers shall take and subscribe the oath prescribed by §

49-1

. The board shall require the superintendent and jail officers to participate in the blanket surety bond plan for state and local employees established in §

2.2-1840

.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-206.7; 1956, c. 681; 1982, c. 636; 1991, c. 383; 1995, c. 5.

§ 53.1-111.
Work of prisoners.

All prisoners convicted and sentenced or transferred to a jail or jail farm shall be required to work on the jail or jail farm or on any other property as the board may direct, unless for good cause shown the court sentencing and committing such prisoners shall order otherwise.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-206.8; 1956, c. 681; 1970, c. 648; 1979, c. 700; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-112.
Jail or jail farm expenses.

Except as provided in §

53.1-114

, the expenses of operating and maintaining a jail or jail farm and supporting the prisoners working thereon, including board, clothing and medical attention, shall be borne by the participating political subdivisions. Such participation shall be based on the percentage of the total cost for such operation that the number of prisoner days bears to the total number of prisoner days confined therein, plus their proportionate part of the fixed cost for such maintenance and operation.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-206.9; 1956, c. 681; 1968, c. 525; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-113.
Transportation of prisoners to jail or jail farm.

Except as provided in §

53.1-114

, each political subdivision participating in a jail or jail farm shall bear the cost of transporting its prisoners to and from the jail or jail farm.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-206.10; 1956, c. 681; 1968, c. 525; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-114.
Reimbursement of costs.

Counties and cities or any combination thereof operating a regional jail or jail farm shall be paid the reasonable cost of maintaining the facility as provided for in §

53.1-85

.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-206.11; 1956, c. 681; 1968, c. 525; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-115.
Payment of salaries of superintendents and medical and treatment personnel.

The Commonwealth shall pay two-thirds of the salaries of the superintendents and approved medical and treatment personnel of such jails. The other one-third shall be paid pro rata by the participating political subdivisions. Such salaries shall be paid in the manner provided in §

15.2-1609.2

, and such section shall be applicable mutatis mutandis to superintendents of such jails.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-206.12; 1970, c. 706; 1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 358.

§ 53.1-115.1.
Superintendents of regional jails and regional jail-farms to make daily reports to Compensation Board.

The superintendent of every regional jail and every regional jail-farm shall report each day to the Compensation Board, giving the record of each prisoner received during the preceding day in an electronic format approved by the Compensation Board, stating whether the offense for each prisoner is for violation of state law or of a city or town ordinance. The computer-generated report shall be authenticated by both the superintendent and chairman of the regional jail-farm board. Either person who authenticates such report and willfully falsifies the information contained in such report is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

If any superintendent fails to send such report, the Compensation Board shall notify the superintendent of such failure. If the superintendent fails to make the report within ten days, then the Compensation Board shall cause the report to be prepared from the books of the superintendent and shall certify the cost thereof to the Comptroller. The Comptroller shall issue his warrant on the Treasurer for that amount, deducting the same from any funds that may be due the superintendent by the Commonwealth.

History.

1983, c. 358; 2000, cc. 70, 291; 2006, cc. 857, 914.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 70 and 291 are identical, and substituted “Compensation Board” for “Director” throughout the section; and substituted “ten business days” for “five days” in the first sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914, effective October 1, 2006, are nearly identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted “each” for “on the first,” deleted “of each month” after “each day,” and substituted “day in an electronic format approved” for “month on blank forms to be furnished” in the first sentence, in the second sentence inserted “computer generated” near the beginning of the sentence and substituted “authenticated” for “signed,” and in the third sentence substituted “person who authenticates such report and” for “signer found guilty,” “falsifies” for “falsified,” and “is” for “shall be”; and in the second paragraph deleted “within ten business days after the date when the report should be forwarded” after “report” in the first sentence, and deleted “from that date” after “ten days” in the second sentence.

§ 53.1-115.2.
Establishment of stores in regional jails and regional jail farms.

The superintendent of a regional jail or regional jail farm may, with the approval of the governing regional jail or jail farm board or jail authority, provide for the establishment and operation of stores or commissaries in regional jail or regional jail farm facilities to deal in such articles as he deems proper.
The net profits from the operation of such stores shall be used within each facility respectively for educational, recreational, or other beneficial purposes as may be prescribed by the superintendent.

History.

1992, c. 185.